Utah statutes.
19-3-107.   State radioactive waste plan.

(1)  The board shall prepare a state plan for management of radioactive waste by July 1, 1993.

(2)  The plan shall:

(a)  provide an estimate of radioactive waste capacity needed in the state for the next 20 years;

(b)  assess the state's ability to minimize waste and recycle;

(c)  evaluate radioactive waste treatment and disposal options, as well as radioactive waste needs and existing capacity;

(d)  evaluate facility siting, design, and operation;

(e)  review funding alternatives for radioactive waste management; and

(f)  address other radioactive waste management concerns that the board finds appropriate for the preservation of the public health and the environment.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

